Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 43. Financial Aid Programs for Postsecondary Students.

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision providing for loan forbearance by the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education in case of financial hardship during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared March 11, 2020, see § 23, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For student financial aid, see 20 AAC 15.

For AlaskAdvantage education grant program, 20 AAC 16.